Washington statutes.
RCW 19.27.540

Electric vehicle infrastructure requirements—Rules.

(1) The building code council shall adopt rules for electric vehicle infrastructure requirements. Rules adopted by the state building code council must consider applicable national and international standards and be consistent with rules adopted under RCW 19.28.281.

(2)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, the rules adopted under this section must require electric vehicle charging capability at all new buildings that provide on-site parking. Where parking is provided, the greater of one parking space or ten percent of parking spaces, rounded to the next whole number, must be provided with wiring or raceway sized to accommodate 208/240 V 40-amp or equivalent electric vehicle charging. Electrical rooms serving buildings with on-site parking must be sized to accommodate the potential for electrical equipment and distribution required to serve a minimum of twenty percent of the total parking spaces with 208/240 V 40-amp or equivalent electric vehicle charging. Load management infrastructure may be used to adjust the size and capacity of the required building electric service equipment and circuits on the customer facilities, as well as electric utility-owned infrastructure, as allowed by applicable local and national electrical code. For accessible parking spaces, the greater of one parking space or ten percent of accessible parking spaces, rounded to the next whole number, must be provided with electric vehicle charging infrastructure that may also serve adjacent parking spaces not designated as accessible parking.

(b) For occupancies classified as assembly, education, or mercantile, the requirements of this section apply only to employee parking spaces. The requirements of this section do not apply to occupancies classified as utility or miscellaneous.

(c) Except for rules related to residential R-3, the required rules required under this subsection must be implemented by July 1, 2021. The rules required under this subsection for occupancies classified as residential R-3 must be implemented by July 1, 2024.

(3)(a) The rules adopted under this section must exceed the specific minimum requirements established under subsection (2) of this section for all types of residential and commercial buildings to the extent necessary to support the anticipated levels of zero emissions vehicle use that result from the zero emissions vehicle program requirements in chapter 70A.30 RCW and that result in emissions reductions consistent with RCW 70A.45.020.

(b) The rules required under this subsection must be implemented by July 1, 2024, and may be periodically updated thereafter.

[ 2021 c 300 s 4; 2019 c 285 s 18; 2009 c 459 s 16.]

NOTES:

Intent—2021 c 300: See note following RCW 47.01.520.

Finding—Purpose—2009 c 459: See note following RCW 47.80.090.

Regional transportation planning organizations—Electric vehicle infrastructure: RCW 47.80.090.